local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="prozor__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="nož__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eva</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="muž__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eva</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="dru/g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>že</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gom</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>govi</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gova</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>govima</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gove</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>govi</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>govima</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>govima</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="drug"><i>dru</i><par n="dru/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prozor"><i>prozor</i><par n="prozor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="život"><i>život</i><par n="prozor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aerodrom"><i>aerodrom</i><par n="prozor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muž"><i>muž</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nož"><i>nož</i><par n="nož__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ključ"><i>ključ</i><par n="nož__n"/></e>
